Nebraska, session 109, LB849.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB849 LB849
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2704.09, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.09 (1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross
receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or
other consumption in this state of (a) insulin, (b) mobility enhancing
equipment and drugs , not including over-the-counter drugs, when sold for
a patient's use under a prescription, (c) over-the-counter drugs, and (d)
(c) the following when sold for a patient's use under a prescription and
which are of the type eligible for coverage under the medical assistance
program established pursuant to the Medical Assistance Act: Durable
medical equipment; home medical supplies; prosthetic devices; oxygen; and
oxygen equipment.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Drug means a compound, substance, preparation, and component of
a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and food
ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages:
(i) Recognized in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, and any supplement to any of them;
(ii) Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment,
or prevention of disease; or
(iii) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body;
(b) Durable medical equipment means equipment which can withstand
repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical
purpose, generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or
injury, is appropriate for use in the home, and is not worn in or on the
body. Durable medical equipment includes repair and replacement parts for
such equipment;
(c) Home medical supplies means supplies primarily and customarily
used to serve a medical purpose which are appropriate for use in the home
and are generally not useful to a person in the absence of illness or
-2-

LB849 LB849
2026 2026
injury;
(d) Mobility enhancing equipment means equipment which is primarily
and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one
place to another, which is not generally used by persons with normal
mobility, and which is appropriate for use either in a home or a motor
vehicle. Mobility enhancing equipment includes repair and replacement
parts for such equipment. Mobility enhancing equipment does not include
any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a
motor vehicle manufacturer;
(e) Over-the-counter drug means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. 201.66, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2026 2003. The over-the-counter drug
label includes a drug facts panel or a statement of the active
ingredients with a list of those ingredients contained in the compound,
substance, or preparation;
(f) Oxygen equipment means oxygen cylinders, cylinder transport
devices including sheaths and carts, cylinder studs and support devices,
regulators, flowmeters, tank wrenches, oxygen concentrators, liquid
oxygen base dispensers, liquid oxygen portable dispensers, oxygen tubing,
nasal cannulas, face masks, oxygen humidifiers, and oxygen fittings and
accessories;
(g) Prescription means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any
form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a
duly licensed practitioner authorized under the Uniform Credentialing
Act; and
(h) Prosthetic devices means a replacement, corrective, or
supportive device worn on or in the body to artificially replace a
missing portion of the body, prevent or correct physical deformity or
malfunction, or support a weak or deformed portion of the body, and
includes any supplies used with such device and repair and replacement
parts.
-3-

LB849 LB849
2026 2026
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2704.09, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-